Virginia statutes. Title 40.1. Labor and Employment.
Chapter 5. Child Labor.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12B M.J. Master and Servant, § 95.

§ 40.1-78.
Employment of children under fourteen and sixteen.

No child under fourteen years of age shall be employed, permitted or suffered to work in, about or in connection with any gainful occupation except as specified in this chapter.

No child under sixteen years of age shall be employed, permitted or suffered to work in, about or in connection with any gainful occupation during school hours unless he has reached the age of fourteen and is enrolled in a regular school work-training program and a work-training certificate has been issued for his employment as provided in §

40.1-88

.

Nothing in this section shall affect the provisions of §§

40.1-100

A,

40.1-100.1

,

40.1-100.2

,

40.1-101

and

40.1-102

.

History.

Code 1950, § 40-96; 1956, c. 567; 1960, c. 434; 1968, c. 264; 1970, c. 321; 1991, c. 511.

Cross references.

As to issuance by judges of juvenile and domestic relations courts of special work permits to children not qualified to obtain work permits under other provisions of law, see § 16.1-241, subsection H.

As to power of the Virginia Lottery Board to license agents and restrict the employment of minors, see §

58.1-4007

.

§ 40.1-79.
Repealed by Acts 1991, c. 511.

Cross references.

For present provision relating to exemptions from chapter generally, see §

40.1-79.01

.

§ 40.1-79.01.
Exemptions from chapter generally.

Nothing in this chapter, except the provisions of §§

40.1-100

A,

40.1-100.1

,

40.1-100.2

, and

40.1-103

, shall apply to:

A child engaged in domestic work when such work is performed in connection with the child’s own home and directly for his parent or a person standing in place of his parent;

A child employed in occasional work performed outside school hours where such work is in connection with the employer’s home but not in connection with the employer’s business, trade, or profession;

A child 12 or 13 years of age employed outside school hours on farms, in orchards or in gardens with the consent of his parent or a person standing in place of his parent;

A child between the ages of 12 and 18 employed as a page or clerk for either the House of Delegates or the Senate of Virginia;

A child participating in the activities of a volunteer emergency medical services agency;

A child under 16 years of age employed by his parent in an occupation other than manufacturing; or

A child 12 years of age or older employed by an eleemosynary organization or unit of state or local government as a referee for sports programs sponsored by that eleemosynary, state, or local organization or by an organization of referees sponsored by an organization recognized by the United States Olympic Committee under 36 U.S.C. § 220522.

Nothing in this chapter, except §§

40.1-100.1

,

40.1-100.2

, and

40.1-103

, shall be construed to apply to a child employed by his parent or a person standing in place of his parent on farms, in orchards or in gardens owned or operated by such parent or person.

History.

1991, c. 511; 1998, c. 30; 2003, c. 380; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

The 1998 amendment,

in subsection A, in subdivision 5, deleted “or” at the end, in subdivision 6, added “or” and added subdivision 7.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 380 in subdivisions A 3, A 4 and A 7, substituted “12” for “twelve”; in subdivision A 3, substituted “13” for “thirteen”; subdivision A 4, substituted “18” for “eighteen” and in subdivision A 6, substituted “16” for “sixteen.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical, and substituted “emergency medical services agency” for “rescue squad” in subdivision A 5.

§ 40.1-79.1.
Exemptions from chapter generally; participation in volunteer fire company activities.

Any county, city or town may authorize by ordinance any person residing anywhere in the Commonwealth, aged 16 years or older, who is a member of a volunteer fire company within such county, city, or town with parental or guardian approval, (i) to seek certification under National Fire Protection Association 1001, level one, firefighter standards, as administered by the Department of Fire Programs; and (ii) to work with or participate in activities of such volunteer fire company, provided such person has attained certification under National Fire Protection Association 1001, level one, firefighter standards, as administered by the Department of Fire Programs. Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit participation by such persons in nonhazardous activities of a volunteer fire company, including fire prevention efforts and training courses approved by the Virginia Fire Services Board that are designed to provide situational awareness. Such ordinance shall not require a minor who achieved certification under National Fire Protection Association 1001, level one, firefighter standards, as administered by the Department of Fire Programs, on or before January 1, 2006, between the ages of 15 and 16, to repeat the certification after his sixteenth birthday.

Any trainer or instructor of such persons mentioned in subsection A and any member of a paid or volunteer fire company who supervises any such persons shall be exempt from the provisions of §

40.1-103

, provided that the provisions of §

40.1-100

have not been violated, when engaged in activities of a volunteer fire company, and provided that the volunteer fire company or the governing body of such county, city or town has purchased insurance which provides coverage for injuries to or the death of such persons in their performance of activities under this section.

History.

1982, c. 344; 1983, c. 123; 1991, c. 511; 2005, c. 151; 2006, c. 462; 2018, c. 181.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, c. 181, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia Fire Services Board shall adopt a junior member policy that provides guidance to fire and rescue departments in developing and administering nonhazardous training courses and programs that comply with the provisions of this act.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 151, effective March 20, 2005, in subsection A, substituted “residing anywhere in the Commonwealth, aged 16 years” for “sixteen years of age,” inserted clause (i), inserted clause (ii) designator; inserted “provided that the provisions of §

40.1-100

have not been violated” in subsection B, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 462 added the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 181, in the first sentence of subsection A, substituted “participate in activities” for “participate fully in all activities” in clause (ii) of the first sentence and added the second sentence; in subsection B, deleted “of this section” following “subsection A.”

§ 40.1-80.
Repealed by Acts 1991, c. 511.

Cross references.

For present provision relating to employment of children, see §

40.1-80.1

.

§ 40.1-80.1.
Employment of children.

Except as provided in §§

40.1-79.01

,

40.1-88

,

40.1-102

, and

40.1-109

, no child under sixteen years of age shall be employed, permitted or suffered to work in, about or in connection with any gainful occupation more than the number of hours per week or more than the number of hours per day or during the hours of the day that the Commissioner shall determine by regulations to be detrimental to the lives, health, safety or welfare of children. These regulations shall incorporate the standards contained in regulations promulgated by the United States Secretary of Labor pursuant to the Fair Labor Standards Act (29 U.S.C. § 201 et seq.) concerning the number of hours per week, hours per day, and the hours of the day that children under the age of sixteen may work in, about, or in connection with, any gainful occupation.

No child shall be employed or permitted to work for more than five hours continuously without an interval of at least thirty minutes for a lunch period, and no period of less than thirty minutes shall be deemed to interrupt a continuous period of work.

History.

1991, c. 511.

§ 40.1-81.
Repealed by Acts 1972, c. 480.

§ 40.1-81.1.
Records to be kept by employers.

Every employer employing minors under sixteen years of age shall keep a time book or time cards or other appropriate records for such minor employees which shall show the beginning and ending time of work each day together with the amount of time designated as a free-from-duty meal period, which is deductible from the schedule of hours of work. The record for the preceding twelve months for each such minor employee shall be kept on the premises for a period of thirty-six months from the date of the latest work period recorded for the minor employee involved.

History.

1972, c. 480; 1982, c. 134; 1991, c. 511.

§ 40.1-82.
Repealed by Acts 1979, c. 219.

§ 40.1-83.
Repealed by Acts 1991, c. 511.

§ 40.1-84.
Employment certificate required.

No child under sixteen years of age shall be employed, permitted or suffered to work, in, about or in connection with any gainful occupation with the exception of volunteer work or work on farms, orchards and in gardens and except as provided in §§

40.1-79.01

,

40.1-101

, and

40.1-102

unless the person, firm or corporation employing such child, procures and keeps on file and accessible to any school attendance officer, representative of the Department or other authorized persons, charged with the enforcement of this chapter, the employment certificate as hereinafter provided, issued for such child.

History.

Code 1950, § 40-100; 1960, c. 434; 1966, c. 603; 1970, c. 321; 1972, cc. 480, 824; 1974, cc. 283, 525; 1979, c. 219; 1991, c. 511.

§ 40.1-85.
Kinds of employment certificates.

Employment certificates shall be of two kinds: work-training certificate and vacation or part-time employment certificate.

History.

Code 1950, § 40-100.1; 1970, c. 321; 1982, c. 135; 1991, c. 511.

§ 40.1-86.
Repealed by Acts 1979, c. 219.

§ 40.1-87.
Vacation or part-time employment certificate.

A vacation or part-time employment certificate shall permit the employment of a child between fourteen and sixteen years of age only during school vacation periods or on days when school is not in session, or outside school hours on school days.

History.

Code 1950, § 40-100.3; 1958, c. 164; 1970, c. 321; 1979, c. 219; 1982, c. 136; 1991, c. 511.

§ 40.1-88.
Work-training certificate.

A work-training certificate shall permit the employment of a child between fourteen and sixteen years of age during school hours when enrolled in a regular school work-training program pursuant to a written agreement containing the same provisions as specified in §

40.1-89

.

History.

Code 1950, § 40-100.4; 1970, c. 321; 1979, c. 219; 1982, c. 670.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12B M.J. Master and Servant, § 95.

§ 40.1-89.
Work-training certificate; employment not allowed; revocation of certificate.

No child shall be employed pursuant to a work-training certificate as provided in §

40.1-88

where such employment requires such child to work in any occupation which is deemed hazardous under §

40.1-100

A or regulations promulgated thereunder.
However, a child sixteen or seventeen years of age may be employed in certain such occupations as part of a work-training program in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the Commissioner.
No child shall work in a work-training program except pursuant to a written agreement which shall provide: (1) that the work of such child shall be incidental to his training, shall be intermittent and for short periods of time and shall be under the direct and close supervision of a competent and experienced person; (2) that safety instruction shall be given by the school and correlated with on-the-job training given by the employer; and (3) that a schedule of organized and progressive work processes to be performed shall have been prepared.
Such written agreement shall set forth the name of the child so employed and shall be signed by the employer and the coordinator of schools having jurisdiction.
Copies of such agreement shall be retained by the school and the employer, and a copy thereof shall be filed with the Department.

Any such work-training certificate or written agreement may be revoked at any time that it shall appear that reasonable precautions for the safety of such child have not been observed.

History.

Code 1950, § 40-100.4:1; 1960, c. 434; 1968, c. 277; 1970, c. 321; 1982, c. 252; 1991, c. 511.

§§ 40.1-90,
40.1-91.
Repealed by Acts 1991, c. 511.

§ 40.1-92.
Issuance of certificates.

The Commissioner shall prescribe the procedures for minors and employers concerning issuance and maintenance of employment certificates. The Commissioner may issue certificates both directly and electronically. Employment certificates shall be issued by the Department only upon application of the child desiring employment. The employment certificate shall not be valid unless permission is granted by a parent, guardian, or custodian through means specified by the Commissioner. The Department shall have authority to make any investigation or examination necessary for the issuance thereof. No fee shall be charged for issuing any such certificate nor for rendering any services in respect thereto. The Commissioner shall file and preserve such certificates and related documents.

No person shall, with the intent to assist a minor to procure employment, make a false statement by any means, including by submitting falsified forms electronically, to any employer or to any representative of the Commissioner in order to obtain the issuance of an employment certificate.

History.

Code 1950, § 40-101; 1960, c. 434; 1970, c. 321; 1979, c. 219; 1991, c. 511; 2013, c. 15.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 15 rewrote the section.

§ 40.1-93.
Proof required for employment certificate.

The Department shall not issue an employment certificate until it has received, examined, approved, and filed the following:

Except for work coming within one of the exceptions in §

40.1-79.01

, a statement signed by the prospective employer, or someone duly authorized on his behalf, stating that he expects to give such child present employment, setting forth the specific nature of the occupation in which he intends to employ such child, and the number of hours per day and of days per week which said child shall be employed and of the period for lunch. Such statement shall be submitted by means specified by the Commissioner; and

A statement, signed by the prospective employer or someone duly authorized on his behalf, submitted by means specified by the Commissioner, that the employer has verified the age of such minor. The employer shall procure and keep on file, accessible to the Department or other authorized persons charged with the enforcement of this chapter, the proof of age as provided in §

40.1-94

.

History.

Code 1950, § 40-102; 1960, c. 434; 1970, c. 321; 1972, c. 480; 1991, c. 511; 2013, c. 15.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 15 substituted “Department shall not issue an employment certificate until it has” for “person authorized to issue an employment certificate shall not issue such certificate until he has” and deleted “papers” at the end of the introductory paragraph; added the last sentence in subdivision 1; and inserted the first sentence and “The employer shall procure and keep on file, accessible to the Department or other authorized persons charged with the enforcement of this chapter, the” at the beginning of subdivision 2.

§ 40.1-94.
Proofs of age.

The evidence of age required by this chapter shall consist of one of the following proofs of age, which shall be required in the order herein designated:

A birth certificate or attested transcript issued by a registrar of vital statistics or other officer charged with the duty of recording births.

A baptismal record or duly certified transcript thereof showing the date of birth and place of baptism of the child.

Other documentary proof of age specified by the Commissioner.

History.

Code 1950, § 40-103; 1970, c. 321.

§ 40.1-95.
Repealed by Acts 1991, c. 511.

§ 40.1-96.
Contents of employment certificates.

The employment certificate required to be issued shall state the name, sex, date of birth, and place of residence of the child. It shall certify that all the conditions and requirements for issuing an employment certificate under the provisions of this chapter have been fulfilled and shall be signed by the Commissioner. It shall state the kind of evidence of age accepted for the employment certificate. Except for work coming within one of the exceptions in §

40.1-79.01

, the certificate shall show the name and address of the employer for whom and the nature of the specific occupation in which the employment certificate authorizes the child to be employed and shall be valid only for the occupation so designated. It shall bear a number, shall show the date of its issue, and shall be signed by the child for whom it is issued by means specified by the Commissioner. The employment certificate shall be issued to the employer, by means specified by the Commissioner, on or prior to the first day of employment. The employer and Commissioner shall retain a manual or electronic copy of the certificate, so long as the youth is employed or for a period of 36 months, whichever is longer.

History.

Code 1950, § 40-105; 1960, c. 434; 1970, c. 321; 1978, c. 596; 1991, c. 511; 2013, c. 15.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 15 substituted “Commissioner” for “person issuing it” at the end of the second sentence, substituted “issued by means specified by the Commissioner” for “issued in the presence of the person issuing it” at the end of the fifth sentence, deleted the former sixth sentence, which read: “It shall be issued in triplicate, one copy to be mailed to the employer, one copy to be sent to the Commissioner and one copy to be retained and kept on file by the issuing officer.” and added the last two sentences.

§ 40.1-97.
Repealed by Acts 1972, c. 480.

§§ 40.1-98,
40.1-99.

Repealed by Acts 1991, c. 511.

§ 40.1-100.
Certain employment prohibited or limited.

No child under 18 years of age shall be employed, permitted, or suffered to work:

In any mine, quarry, tunnel, underground scaffolding work; in or about any plant or establishment manufacturing or storing explosives or articles containing explosive components; in any occupation involving exposure to radioactive substances or to ionizing radiations including X-ray equipment;

At operating or assisting to operate any grinding, abrasive, polishing or buffing machine, any power-driven metal forming, punching or shearing machine, power-driven bakery machine, power-driven paper products machine, any circular saw, band saw or guillotine shear, or any power-driven woodworking machine;

In oiling or assisting in oiling, wiping and cleaning any such machinery;

In any capacity in preparing any composition in which dangerous or poisonous chemicals are used;

In any capacity in the manufacturing of paints, colors, white lead, or brick tile or kindred products, or in any place where goods of alcoholic content are manufactured, bottled, or sold for consumption on the premises except in places (i) licensed pursuant to subdivision 6 of §

4.1-206.1

, provided that a child employed at the premises shall not serve or dispense in any manner alcoholic beverages or (ii) where the sale of alcoholic beverages is merely incidental to the main business actually conducted, or to deliver alcoholic goods;

In any capacity in or about excavation, demolition, roofing, wrecking or shipbreaking operations;

As a driver or a helper on an automobile, truck, or commercial vehicle; however, children who are at least 17 years of age may drive automobiles or trucks on public roadways if:

The automobile or truck does not exceed 6,000 pounds gross vehicle weight, the vehicle is equipped with seat belts for the driver and any passengers, and the employer requires the employee to use the seatbelts when driving the automobile or truck;

Driving is restricted to daylight hours;

The employee has a valid State license for the type of driving involved and has no record of any moving violations at the time of hire;

The employee has successfully completed a State-approved driver education course;

The driving does not involve: (i) the towing of vehicles; (ii) route deliveries or route sales; (iii) the transportation for hire of property, goods, or passengers; (iv) urgent, time-sensitive deliveries; or (v) the transporting at any time of more than three passengers, including the employees of the employer;

The driving performed by the employee does not involve more than two trips away from the primary place of employment in any single day for the purpose of delivering goods of the employee’s employer to a customer;

The driving performed by the employee does not involve more than two trips away from the primary place of employment in any single day for the purpose of transporting passengers, other than employees of the employer;

The driving takes place within a 30-mile radius of the employee’s place of employment; and

The driving is only occasional and incidental to the employee’s employment and involves no more than one third of the employee’s work time in any workday and no more than 20 percent work time in any work week;

Except as part of a regular work-training program in accordance with §§

40.1-88

and

40.1-89

, no child under 16 years of age shall be employed, permitted or suffered to work:

In any manufacturing or mechanical establishment, in any commercial cannery; in the operation of any automatic passenger or freight elevator; in any dance studio; or in any hospital, nursing home, clinic, or other establishment providing care for resident patients as a laboratory helper, therapist, orderly, or nurse’s aide; in the service of any veterinarian while treating farm animals or horses; in any warehouse; in processing work in any laundry or dry cleaning establishment; in any undertaking establishment or funeral home; in any curb service restaurant, in hotel and motel room service; in any brick, coal or lumber yard or ice plant or in ushering in theaters. Children 14 years of age or more may be engaged in office work of a clerical nature in bona fide office rooms in the above types of establishments.

In any scaffolding work or construction trade; or in any outdoor theater, cabaret, carnival, fair, floor show, pool hall, club, or roadhouse; or as a lifeguard at a beach.

Children 14 years of age or more may be employed by dry cleaning or laundry establishments in branch stores where no processing is done on the premises, and in hospitals, nursing homes, and clinics where they may be engaged in kitchen work, tray service or room and hall cleaning. Children 14 years of age or more may be employed in bowling alleys completely equipped with automatic pin setters, but not in or about such machines, and in soda fountains, restaurants and hotel and motel food service departments. Children 14 years of age or more may work as gatekeepers and in concessions at swimming pools and may be employed by concessionaires operating on beaches where their duties and work pertain to the handling and distribution of beach chairs, umbrellas, floats and other similar or related beach equipment.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter:

Children age 16 years or older employed on farms, in gardens or in orchards may operate, assist in operating, or otherwise perform work involving a truck, excluding a tractor trailer, or farm vehicle as defined in §

46.2-1099

, in their employment;

Children age 14 years or older employed on farms, in gardens or in orchards may perform work as a helper on a truck or commercial vehicle in their employment, while engaged in such work exclusively on a farm, in a garden or in an orchard;

Children age 16 years or older may participate in all activities of a volunteer fire company; however, any such child shall not enter a burning structure or a structure which contains burning materials prior to obtaining certification under National Fire Protection Association 1001, level one, fire fighter standards, pursuant to the provisions of clause (i) of subsection A of §

40.1-79.1

, except where entry into a structure that contains burning materials is during training necessary to attain certification under National Fire Protection Association 1001, level one, firefighter standards, as administered by the Department of Fire Programs.

8.

In logging or sawmilling, or in any lath mill, shingle mill or cooperage-stock mill, or in any occupation involving slaughtering, meatpacking, processing or rendering;

9.

In any occupation determined and declared hazardous by rules and regulations promulgated by the Commissioner of Labor and Industry, except as otherwise provided in subsection D.Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, children 16 years of age or older who are serving a voluntary apprenticeship as provided in Chapter 6 (§

40.1-117

et seq.) of this title may be employed in any occupation in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the Commissioner.

History.

Code 1950, § 40-109; 1956, cc. 443, 463; 1958, c. 321; 1960, c. 434; 1964, c. 503; 1968, c. 278; 1970, c. 321; 1972, c. 824; 1973, c. 13; 1979, cc. 219, 348; 1991, c. 511; 1994, c. 156; 2005, c. 151; 2007, c. 645; 2008, c. 552; 2009, c. 218; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 151, effective March 20, 2005, added “except as otherwise provided in subsection D” at the end of subdivision A 9, substituted “aged 16 years or older” for “sixteen years of age or more” in subdivision D 1, substituted “aged 14 years or older” for “fourteen years of age or more” in subdivision D 2, added subdivision D 3, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 645 in subdivision A 5, inserted clause (i) and the clause (ii) designation.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 552 deleted the second sentence in subdivision A 7, which read: “The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to the drivers of school buses.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 218, in subsection A, rewrote subdivision A 7, which read: “As a driver or a helper on a truck or commercial vehicle of more than two axles.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114, effective January 1, 2022, are identical, and in subdivision A 5, substituted “subdivision 6 of §

4.1-206.1

” for “subdivision 5 of §

4.1-207

” in clause (i); and in subsection D, substituted “age” for “aged” wherever it occurs.

Cross references.

As to prohibition of persons under 18 from working in or around mines, see §

45.2-504

.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia criminal law for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 241 (1980).

For annual survey article, “Labor and Employment Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 513 (2009).

§ 40.1-100.1.
Employment where hazard capable of causing serious physical harm or death.

No person shall employ, suffer, or permit a child to work in any gainful occupation that exposes such child to a recognized hazard capable of causing serious physical harm or death to such child.
Any person violating this section shall be subject to a civil monetary penalty in accordance with §

40.1-113

of this chapter.

History.

1991, c. 511.

§ 40.1-100.2.
Employment involving sexually explicit visual material prohibited.

A person under eighteen years of age shall not perform in or be a subject of sexually explicit visual material.
As used in this section, “sexually explicit visual material” means a picture, photograph, drawing, sculpture, motion picture film or similar visual representation which is obscene for children, as defined in §

18.2-374.1

, and which depicts nudity, sexual excitement, sexual conduct, sexual intercourse or sadomasochistic abuse, as defined in §

18.2-390

, or a book, magazine or pamphlet which contains such a visual representation.
An undeveloped photograph or similar visual material may be sexually explicit material notwithstanding that processing or other action is necessary to make its sexually explicit content apparent.
A person who employs, permits or suffers a person to be employed or work in violation of this section is guilty of a Class 6 felony.

History.

1991, c. 511.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 6 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

As to seizure of property used in connection with certain offenses, see §

19.2-386.35

.

§ 40.1-101.
Qualifications as to theaters.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

40.1-100

and

40.1-100.1

, a child under sixteen years of age, whether a resident or nonresident of the Commonwealth, may be employed, permitted or suffered to participate in the presentation of a drama, play, performance, concert or entertainment, provided the management of the theater or other public place where such performance is to be held in the Commonwealth shall secure a permit from the Commissioner; provided, that no such permit shall be required for any nonprofit dance or music recital, nor for any television or radio broadcast in which the children participating are selected by the television or radio broadcasting station for sustaining noncommercial programs.

History.

Code 1950, § 40-110; 1960, c. 434; 1970, c. 321; 1973, c. 13; 1979, c. 348; 1991, c. 511.

§ 40.1-102.
Issuance of theatrical permit.

No permit shall be issued unless the Commissioner is satisfied that the environment in which the drama, play, performance, concert or entertainment is to be produced is a proper environment for the child and that the conditions of such employment are not detrimental to the health or morals of such child and that the child’s education will not be neglected or hampered by its participation in such drama, play, performance, concert or entertainment. Applications for permits and every permit granted shall specify the name, age and sex of each child, together with such other facts as may be necessary for the proper identification of each child and the dates when, and the theaters or other places of amusement in which such drama, play, performance, concert or entertainment is to be produced and shall specify the name of the drama, play, performance, concert or entertainment in which each child is permitted to participate. Such application shall be filed with the Commissioner not less than five days before the date of such drama, play, performance, concert or entertainment. A permit shall be revocable by the Commissioner should it be found that the environment in which the drama, play, performance, concert or entertainment is being produced is not a proper environment for the child and that the conditions of such employment are detrimental to the health or morals of such child. The Commissioner shall prescribe and supply the forms required for carrying out the provisions of this section.

History.

Code 1950, § 40-111; 1960, c. 434; 1970, c. 321.

§ 40.1-103.
Cruelty and injuries to children; penalty; abandoned infant.

It shall be unlawful for any person employing or having the custody of any child willfully or negligently to cause or permit the life of such child to be endangered or the health of such child to be injured, or willfully or negligently to cause or permit such child to be placed in a situation that its life, health or morals may be endangered, or to cause or permit such child to be overworked, tortured, tormented, mutilated, beaten or cruelly treated. Any person violating this section is guilty of a Class 6 felony.

If a prosecution under this section is based solely on the accused parent having left the child at a hospital or emergency medical services agency, it shall be an affirmative defense to prosecution of a parent under this section that such parent safely delivered the child within the first 30 days of the child’s life to (i) a hospital that provides 24-hour emergency services, (ii) an attended emergency medical services agency that employs emergency medical services personnel, or (iii) a newborn safety device located at and operated by such hospital or emergency medical services agency. In order for the affirmative defense to apply, the child shall be delivered in a manner reasonably calculated to ensure the child’s safety.

History.

Code 1950, § 40-112; 1970, c. 321; 1991, c. 511; 2003, cc. 816, 822; 2006, c. 935; 2015, cc. 502, 503; 2022, cc. 80, 81.

Cross references.

As to exemption from this section of trainers, instructors, or supervisors of persons 16 years of age or older who are authorized by local ordinance to participate in volunteer fire company activities, see §

40.1-79.1

.

As to immunity of hospital or rescue squad personnel for acceptance of infants under subsection B of this section, see §

8.01-226.5:2

. As to the Virginia Child Protection Accountability System, see §

63.2-1530

.

As to punishment for Class 6 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

As to seizure of property used in connection with certain offenses, see §

19.2-386.35

.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 816 and 822 are identical, and designated the existing provisions of the section as subsection A and added subsection B.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 935 added the last sentence of subsection B.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical, and substituted “is guilty” for “shall be guilty” in subsection A; and in subsection B, substituted “emergency medical services agency” for “rescue squad” throughout the subsection and “emergency medical services personnel” for “emergency medical technicians.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 80 and 81 are identical, and in subsection B, inserted “within the first 30 days of the child’s life,” “(i),” and “(ii),” deleted “or to” following “24-hour emergency services,” and substituted “or (iii) a newborn safety device located at and operated by such hospital or emergency medical services agency” for “within the first 14 days of the child’s life”; and made a stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Family and Juvenile Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 151 (2006).

For annual survey article, “Criminal Law and Procedure,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 59 (2011).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Infants, § 89; 14A M.J. Parent and Child, § 22.

§ 40.1-104.
Age certificates.

An age certificate shall be issued, upon request of the employer or the worker, for a person sixteen years of age or over. It shall be issued by the person authorized to issue employment certificates under the provisions of this chapter upon presentation of the same evidence of age as required for an employment certificate. The age certificate shall show the person’s name and address, his date of birth and signature, the signature of the person issuing the certificate and the evidence accepted as proof of age.

An employment or age certificate duly issued shall be conclusive evidence of the age of the person for whom issued in any proceeding involving the employment of the person under any of the labor laws of this Commonwealth as to any act occurring subsequent to its issuance and prior to its revocation.

History.

Code 1950, § 40-113; 1970, c. 321; 1972, c. 824; 1979, c. 219.

§ 40.1-105.
Repealed by Acts 1991, c. 511.

§§ 40.1-106 through 40.1-108.

Repealed by Acts 1979, c. 219.

§ 40.1-109.
Newspaper carriers on regular routes; hours.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this chapter, any child between twelve and sixteen years of age may daily engage in the occupation of distributing newspapers on regularly established routes between the hours of four o’clock ante meridian and seven o’clock post meridian, excluding the time public schools are actually in session.

History.

Code 1950, § 40-118; 1960, c. 434; 1962, c. 352; 1970, c. 321; 1972, c. 807; 1973, c. 13; 1979, c. 219; 1982, c. 83; 1991, c. 511.

§ 40.1-110.
Repealed by Acts 1979, c. 219.

§ 40.1-111.
Repealed by Acts 1991, c. 511.